District of Columbia statutes.
47-2832.01

Parking establishments.

Any license or permit for a parking establishment issued under this chapter shall be issued as a General Services and Repair endorsement to a basic business license under the basic business license system as set forth in subchapter I-A of this chapter.

Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 2003(pp)(37A), 46 DCR 3142
Apr. 12, 2000, D.C. Law 13-91, § 157(d)(3)-(4), 47 DCR 520
Oct. 28, 2003, D.C. Law 15-38, § 3(hh)(4)(R), 50 DCR 6913
1981 Ed., § 47-2832.1.
D.C. Law 15-38 substituted “General Services and Repair endorsement to a basic business license under the basic” for “Class B General Services and Repair endorsement to a master business license under the master”.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3(hh)(4)(R) of Streamlining Regulation Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-145, August 11, 2003, 50 DCR 6896).